Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1596.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Free play” means activities that:
(A) Are performed by a child for self-amusement; and
(B) Are spontaneous, voluntary, unstructured and child-directed.
(b) “Guided play” means experiences that:
(A) Are under adult guidance; and
(B) Combine the child-directed nature of free play with a focus on learning outcomes.
(c) “Play-based learning” means learning that:
(A) Emphasizes free play or guided play; and
(B) Uses developmentally appropriate strategies that can be integrated into existing
learning standards.
(2) Any rules adopted by the State Board of Education that prescribe requirements for
instructional time shall allow play-based learning to be considered instructional time for
students in kindergarten through grade five.
(3) For the purpose of this section, play-based learning does not include participation in
physical education that complies with the requirements of ORS 329.496 or recess.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 1

Passed by Senate February 19, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House February 26, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 2